src/morphology/stems/noninflecting_verbs.lexc
LEXICON NoninflectingVerbs

kuulukse+V:kuulukse # ;
näikse+V:n˘äikse # ;
tunnukse+V:tunnukse # ;
 ära+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2+Neg:ära # ;
 ära+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Neg:ärgu # ;
 ära+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1+Neg:ärgem # ;
 ära+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1+Neg+Use/Rare:ärme # ;
 ära+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2+Neg:ärge # ;
 ära+V+Pers+Prt+Imprt+Neg:ärnud # ;
 ära+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt+Neg:ärdagu # ;

 ei+V+Neg:ei # ;
